District of Columbia statutes.
38-273.02

Eligibility and priority for enrollment in pre-k.

(a)

To be eligible for enrollment in pre-k, a child shall be a resident of the District and be of pre-k age, or become 3 years of age on or before September 30th of the program year.

(b)

Except as provided in subsection (c) of this section, priority enrollment shall be first to children who live within the school’s attendance zone boundary, as established pursuant to law and regulation, if applicable, and then to children whose family income is between 130% and 250% of federal poverty guidelines, and to children whose family income is below 130% who are not served by existing programs.

(c)

Enrollment for pre-k programs in District of Columbia Public Charter Schools shall be conducted according to the admission and enrollment provisions of § 38-1802.06.

July 18, 2008, D.C. Law 17-202, § 302, 55 DCR 6297
Mar. 25, 2009, D.C. Law 17-353, § 306, 56 DCR 1117
Sept. 24, 2010, D.C. Law 18-223, § 4002, 57 DCR 6242
Short title: Section 4001 of D.C. Law 18-223 provided that subtitle A of title IV of the act may be cited as the “Pre-k Enrollment Amendment Act of 2010”.
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 4002 of Fiscal Year 2011 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2010 (D.C. Act 18-463, July 2, 2010, 57 DCR 6542).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 2(f) of Pre-K Acceleration and Clarification Emergency Amendment Act of 2009 (D.C. Act 18-304, January 28, 2010, 57 DCR 1475).
Section 5(a) of D.C. Law 18-142 provided that the act shall expire after 225 days of its having taken effect.
Section 2(f) of D.C. Law 18-142, in subsec. (b), substituted “then, if applicable, to children” for “then to children”.
D.C. Law 18-223, in subsec. (b), substituted “Except as provided in subsection (c) of this section, priority enrollment” for “Priority enrollment”; and added subsec. (c).
D.C. Law 17-353 validated a previously made technical correction in the subsec. (b).